test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h5_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: barn
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: barn
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: barni
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: barns
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: børn
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: børn
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: børnum
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: barna
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: barnið
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: barnið
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: barninum
    barn+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: barnsins
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: børnini
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: børnini
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: børnunum
    barn+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: barnanna
